Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4107.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-816, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-816. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Nonresident pupil" means a pupil who resides in this state and who is enrolled in or is seeking enrollment in a school district other than the school district in which the pupil resides. 2. "Open enrollment" means a policy that is adopted and implemented by a school district governing board to allow resident transfer pupils to enroll in any school within the school district, to allow resident pupils to enroll in any school located within other school districts in this state and to allow nonresident pupils to enroll in any school within the district pursuant to section 15-816.01. 3. "Resident pupil" means a pupil whose residence is within the attendance area of a school. 4. "Resident school" means a school that is within the designated attendance area in which a pupil resides. 5. "Resident transfer pupil" means either: (a) A resident pupil who is enrolled in or seeking enrollment in a school that is within the school district but outside the attendance area of the pupil's residence. (b) A pupil whose residence is located on tribal land and outside of the boundaries of any school district and who is Enrolled in or seeking enrollment in a school that is within one of the three closest school districts to the pupil's residence.  For the purposes of this subdivision, the closest school districts are determined by calculating the shortest distance from the pupil's residence to the boundaries of each school district. 6. "Tribal land" means lands owned or held by a federally recognized Indian tribe, nation, band or community as reservation lands, allotment lands or sovereign or proprietary lands or in any other capacity. END_STATUTE